th: ประเภทการเชื่อมต่อปล่องระบายควัน: แบบหนีบ; มีขอบ; แบบแถบรัดล็อก; กดเข้า; แบบยึดด้วยหมุดย้ำ; แบบข้อต่อสวม; การเชื่อมด้วยตัวทำละลาย; เกลียว; แบบเชื่อม; อื่นๆ
it: Tipo di relazione del tubo di scarico: Morsetto; Flangiato; Fascia di bloccaggio; Ad innesto; Rivettato; Giunto scorrevole; Giunzione con solvente; Filettato; Saldato; Altro
nb: Forbindelsestype for røykrør: Klemme; Med flens; Låsebånd; Trykk-inn; Naglet; Glideledd; Løsemiddelsveiset; Gjenget; Sveiset; Annet
ro-RO: Tipul de racordare a tubului de evacuare: Clemă; Cu flanșe; Bandă de blocare; Fixare prin împingere; Nituit; Îmbinare glisantă; Lipire cu solvent; Filetat; Sudat; Altele
en: Flue pipe connection type: Clamp; Flanged; Locking band; Push-fit; Riveted; Slip joint; Solvent weld; Threaded; Welded; Other
bg-BG: Тип връзка на димоотводната тръба: Скоба; Фланци; Заключваща скоба; Натискане; Занитено; Плъзгаща се съединителна връзка; Заваряване с разтворител; С резба; Заварено; Друго
ja: 煙道管の連結タイプ: クランプ; フランジ型; ロックバンド; プッシュフィット; リベット留め; スリップジョイント; 溶剤溶接; ねじ込み; 溶接; その他
zh-CN: 烟管连接类型: 夹式; 法兰式; 锁带式; 推入式; 铆接; 套接; 溶剂焊接; 螺纹式; 焊接; 其他
es: Tipo de conexión del conducto de humos: Pinza; Con bridas; Banda de bloqueo; Ajuste por presión; Remachado; Junta deslizante; Soldadura química; Roscada; Soldado; Otros
ru: Тип соединения трубы дымохода: Зажимное; Фланцевое; Фиксирующий хомут; Раструбное; На заклепках; Скользящее соединение; Сварка растворителем; Резьбовое; Сварное соединение; Другое
el: Τύπος σύνδεσης σωλήνα καπναγωγού: Με σφιγκτήρα; Με φλάντζα; Δακτύλιος σύσφιξης; Κοιυμπωτή σύνδεση; Πριτσινωτή σύνδεση; Σύνδεση ολίσθησης; Συγκόλληση με διαλύτη; Με σπείρωμα; Συγκολλητή σύνδεση; Άλλο
sv: Rökrörskopplingstyp: Klämma; Flänsat; Låsband; Snabbkoppling; Nitad; Glidfog; Lösningsmedelsfog; Gängad; Svetsad; Övrigt
fi: Savupiipun liitäntätyyppi: Puristin; Laipallinen; Lukituspanta; Työnnettävä liitos; Niitattu; Liukuliitos; Liuotushitsaus; Kierteinen; Hitsattu; Muu
de: Typ der Abzugrohrverbindung: Zwinge; Mit Lamellen; Verriegelungsband; Steckverbindung; Vernietet; Gleitgelenk; Mit Lösungsmittel geklebt; Mit Gewinde; Geschweißt; Sonstiges
da: Røgrørs tilslutningstype: Klemme; Flanget; Låsebånd; Pushfit; Nittet; Forskydelig samling; Solvent weld; Gevind; Svejset; Andet
nl: Type rookgasafvoerverbinding: Klem; Met flensen; Vergrendelingsband; Drukpassing; Geklonken; Schuifverbinding; Lijmverbinding; Schroefdraad; Gelast; Overig
pt-BR: Tipo de conexão do tubo da chaminé: Braçadeira; Com flanges; Faixa de travamento; Encaixe por pressão; Rebitado; Junta deslizante; Soldada com solvente; Rosqueado; Soldado; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta priključka cijevi dimnjaka: Stezaljka; S prirubnicom; Traka za zaključavanje; Utisni spoj; Zakovano; Klizni spoj; Zavarivanje otapalom; Navoj; Zavareno; Ostalo
lt-LT: Dūmtraukio jungties tipas: Spaustukas; Briaunuotas; Fiksavimo juosta; Įspaudžiamas; Kniedėmis pritvirtintas; Slydimo jungtis; Tirpiklinis suvirinimas; Srieginis; Suvirintas; Kita
tr: Baca borusu ilişkisi tipi: Kelepçeli; Flanşlı; Kilitleme bandı; İtmeli geçme; Perçinli; Kayar mafsal; Solvent kaynağı; Dişli; Kaynaklı; Diğer
hu: Füstcső csatlakozásának típusa: Bilincs; Peremes; Rögzítőszalag; Tolóillesztéses; Szegecselt; Csúszóillesztés; Oldószeres hegesztésű; Menetes; Hegesztett; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ pripojenia dymovodu: Svorka; Prírubový; Sťahovací uzáver; Zatlačovací; Nitované; Posuvný spoj; Zváranie rozpúšťadlom; Závitový; Zvárané; Iné
vi: Loại kết nối ống khói: Kẹp; Mặt bích; Đai khóa; Lắp ép; Đóng đinh tán; Khớp trượt; Hàn dung môi; Có ren; Hàn; Khác
sl-SI: Vrsta priključka dimne cevi: Objemka; S prirobnicami; Zaklepni trak; Vtični spoj; Zakovičeno; Drsni spoj; Varjenje s topilom; Navojna; Varjeno; Druga
ko: 연통 파이프 연결 방식: 클램프; 플랜지형; 잠금 밴드; 푸시핏; 리벳 연결; 슬립 조인트 연결; 용접식; 스레디드; 용접 연결; 기타
cs: Typ propojení kouřovodu: Objímka; Příruby; Zajišťovací spona; Zásuvný spoj; Nýtované; Násuvné; Svařování za studena; Závit; Svařované; Jiné
pt-PT: Tipo de ligação do tubo de combustão: Grampo; Flangeado; Faixa de bloqueio; Encaixe por pressão; Rebitado; Junta deslizante; Solda com solvente; Roscado; Soldado; Outro
zh-TW: 煙管連接類型: 夾式; 法蘭盤; 鎖帶; 推入式; 鉚接; 滑動接頭; 溶劑焊接; 螺紋式; 焊接; 其他
pl: Typ przewodu kominowego: Zacisk; Kołnierzowy; Opaska zaciskowa; Wciskany; Nitowane; Połączenie wsuwane; Klejony; Gwintowane; Spawane; Pozostałe
fr: Type de raccord de conduit de fumée: Bride; À ailettes; Collier de verrouillage; Enclipsage; Riveté; Emboîtement; Soudure par solvant; Fileté; Soudé; Autre